New York, session 2025-2026, A4170.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 352 of the public authorities law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision 5 to read as follows: 3 5. (a) Prior to any meeting of the board, the board shall: 4 (i) not less than two weeks prior to such meeting, provide the public 5 with notice of such meeting. Such notice shall include at a minimum, the 6 date, time and location of such meeting; 7 (ii) not less than one week prior to such meeting, provide the public 8 with a description of such meeting, setting forth the details of all 9 items to be considered at such meeting; and 10 (iii) not less than one week prior to such meeting, provide any party 11 with an interest in such meeting to sign up for public comment at such 12 meeting. 13 (b) The notice, description of meeting details and sign up list 14 required by paragraph (a) of this subdivision shall be made available 15 and published in a conspicuous location on the website of the authority. 16 § 2. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 17 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05249-01-5